North Dakota statutes. TITLE 43 Occupations and Professions
CHAPTER 43-19.1 Professional Engineers and Land Surveyors
43-19.1-27.
Right to practice.

A person may not practice or offer to practice professional engineering or land surveying unless the person is an individual registered to practice under or exempt from the provisions of this chapter. The practice of engineering by a professional engineer which includes service or creative work that is included in both the definition of the practice of engineering and the definition of land surveying does not require registration as a professional land surveyor. The practice of land surveying by a professional land surveyor which includes a service or creative work that is included in both the definition of the practice of engineering and the definition of land surveying does not require registration as a professional engineer.

The following are not considered offering to practice engineering or surveying in the solicitation of work if the engineer or surveyor is licensed in another jurisdiction:

Advertising in a publication or electronic media if there is no holding out of professional services in jurisdictions in which not licensed.

Responding to a letter of inquiry regarding a request for proposals if there is written disclosure the engineer, surveyor, or firm is not licensed in this state and the response is limited to inquiries regarding scope of project and to demonstrate interest.

Responding to a letter of inquiry from a prospective client if there is written disclosure that the engineer, surveyor, or firm is not licensed in this state and the response is limited to inquiries regarding scope of project and to demonstrate interest.

Using the title or designation “professional engineer”, “licensed engineer”, “P.E.”, “professional surveyor”, “licensed surveyor”, “P.L.S.”, or similar title or designation in correspondence or on business cards from an office in the jurisdiction in which licensure is held.

Notwithstanding subsection 2, a proposal may not be submitted, a contract may not be signed, or work may not be commenced until an engineer, surveyor, or firm becomes licensed as provided under this chapter.

A registered professional engineer or registered land surveyor may practice or offer to practice professional engineering or land surveying as an organization or as an individual operating under a trade name if the organization is registered under or exempt from the provisions of this chapter.

In addition to and without impairing any rights or exemptions granted others in this chapter, the practice of or offer to practice professional engineering or land surveying by an organization or by an individual operating under a trade name is permitted in this state if:

All officers, employees, and agents of such an organization or the individual operating under a trade name who will perform the practice of engineering or of land surveying within this state are registered under this chapter;

Each person in responsible charge of the activities of any organization or individual operating under a trade name which activities constitute the practice of professional engineering and land surveying, is a professional engineer or land surveyor registered in this state or an individual authorized to practice professional engineering or land surveying as provided in this chapter;

Such organization or individual operating under a trade name has been issued a certificate of commercial practice by the board as provided by subsection 6;

Each organization or individual operating under a trade name is jointly and severally responsible with and for the conduct or acts of its agents, employees, officers, or managers in respect to any professional engineering or land surveying services performed or to be executed in this state. An individual practicing professional engineering or land surveying may not be relieved of the responsibility for the individual’s conduct or acts performed by reason of the individual’s employment by or relationship with such organization or individual operating under a trade name; and

All final drawings, specifications, plans, reports, or other engineering or land surveying papers or documents involving the practice of professional engineering or land surveying, when presented to a client, contractor, subconsultant, or any public agency, must be dated and bear the seals and signatures of the professional engineers or land surveyors registered under this chapter by whom or under whose responsible charge they were prepared. A working drawing or unfinished document must contain a statement to the effect the drawing or document is preliminary and not for construction, recording purposes, or implementation. It is unlawful for a registrant to affix or permit the registrant’s seal and signature or facsimiles thereof to be affixed to any engineering drawing, specification, map, plat, report, or other document after the expiration or revocation or during the suspension of a certificate or for the purpose of aiding and abetting any other person to evade or attempt to evade any provision of this chapter.

An organization or individual operating under a trade name desiring a certificate of commercial practice or the renewal thereof shall file a written application with the board setting forth the names and addresses of all partners, officers, directors, managers, or governors, if any, of such organization and the names and addresses of all employees who are duly registered to practice professional engineering or land surveying in this state, and who are or will be in responsible charge of any engineering or land surveying in this state by such organization or individual operating under a trade name, together with other information as the board may require. Upon the receipt of an application, and of a fee in an amount established by the board for the initial certificate or renewal thereof, but not to exceed the amount of two hundred dollars per year, the board shall issue to such organization or individual operating under a trade name a certificate of commercial practice or a renewal thereof, which certificate of commercial practice is not transferable. If the board finds an error in an application or that facts exist which would entitle the board to suspend or revoke a certificate if issued to the applicant, the board shall deny the application. If a change occurs in any of the information submitted on the application of any organization or individual operating under a trade name within the term of the certificate of commercial practice, the organization or individual operating under a trade name shall file with the board a written report with respect to the change within thirty days after the change occurs. The provisions with respect to issuance, expiration, renewal, and reissuance of the certificates of registration of individuals contained in this chapter also apply to certificates of commercial practice issued to an organization or individual operating under a trade name under this subsection. An organization or individual operating under a trade name is subject to disciplinary proceedings and penalties and certificates of commercial practice are subject to suspension or revocation for cause in the same manner and to the same extent as is provided with respect to an individual and the individual’s certificates of registration in sections 43-19.1-26, 43-19.1-29, and 43-19.1-31. “Registrant” and “certificate of registration” in sections 43-19.1-26, 43-19.1-29, and 43-19.1-31, and the provisions of such sections, include and apply respectively to any organization or individual operating under a trade name that holds a certificate of commercial practice issued under this chapter, and to such certificate of commercial practice.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 27; 1977, ch. 404, § 4; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2009, ch. 368, § 27; 2011, ch. 314, § 2.

Cross-References.

Professional corporations, see N.D.C.C. ch. 10-31.

Collateral References.

Engineering services: what amounts to architectural or engineering services within license requirements, 82 A.L.R.2d 1013.

43-19.1-28.
Public works.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the state and its political subdivisions may not engage in the construction of public works involving the practice of professional engineering when the contemplated expenditure for the project exceeds the sum of two hundred thousand dollars, unless the engineering drawings and specifications and estimates have been prepared by, and the construction administration and construction observation services are executed under the supervision of, a registered professional engineer. Any engineering contract executed in violation of this section is void.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 28; 1983, ch. 483, § 1; 1997, ch. 396, § 1; 2015, ch. 154, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 381, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

43-19.1-29.
Exemption clause.

This chapter does not prevent or affect:

The practice or offer to practice engineering by an individual not a resident or having no established place of business in this state, if that individual is legally qualified by registration to practice engineering in another state or country that extends similar privileges to individuals registered under this chapter. However, that individual shall make an application accompanied by the appropriate application fee to the board in writing before practicing or offering to practice engineering, and may be granted a one-time temporary permit for a definite period of time not to exceed one year to do a specific job. No right to practice engineering accrues to any applicant with respect to any other work not set forth in the temporary permit. A land surveyor may not receive a temporary permit under this subsection.

The work of an employee or a subordinate of an individual holding a certificate of registration under this chapter, or an employee of an individual practicing lawfully under subsection 1; provided such work does not include final engineering or surveying designs or decisions and is done under the direct supervision of and verified by an individual holding a certificate of registration under this chapter, or an individual practicing lawfully under subsection 1.

The practice of any other legally recognized profession or trade, nor does the chapter permit registered professional engineers to perform duties requiring the services of a licensed architect, as provided by the laws of the state of North Dakota licensing and regulating architects and architecture.

The practice of engineering or land surveying by any individual regularly employed to perform engineering services solely for that individual’s employer or for a subsidiary or affiliated corporation or limited liability company of that individual’s employer, providing the services performed are in connection with the property, products, or services of that individual’s employer, unless the board determines the property, products, or services are of a unique type requiring registration to protect the public.

The performance of work ordinarily performed by a person that operates or maintains machinery or equipment.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 29; 1983, ch. 484, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2009, ch. 368, § 28; 2011, ch. 314, § 3.

Collateral References.

Engineering services: what amounts to architectural or engineering services within license requirements, 82 A.L.R.2d 1013.

Compensation: right of architect or engineer licensed in one state to recover compensation for services rendered in another state, or in connection with construction in another state, where he is not licensed in the latter state, 32 A.L.R.3d 1151.

43-19.1-30.
Duties of recorder.

It is unlawful for the recorder of any county or any county or any proper public authority to file or record any map, plat, survey, or other document within the definition of land surveying which does not have impressed thereon and affixed thereto the personal signature and seal of a registered professional land surveyor by whom the map, plat, survey, or other document was prepared.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 30; 2001, ch. 120, § 1; 2009, ch. 368, § 29.

Cross-References.

Registers of deeds [now recorders], see N.D.C.C. ch. 11-18.

43-19.1-31.
Violation and penalties.

Any person that practices or offers to practice engineering or land surveying in this state without being registered in accordance with the provisions of this chapter; any person using or employing the words “engineer”, “engineering”, “professional engineer”, “surveyor”, “land surveyor”, “professional land surveyor”, or any modification or derivative of these terms in that person’s name, form of business, or activity, except as authorized in this chapter; any person presenting or attempting to use the certificate of registration or the seal of another; any person giving any false or forged evidence of any kind to the board or to any member of the board in obtaining or attempting to obtain a certificate of registration; or any person falsely impersonating any other registrant of like or different name; any person attempting to use an expired or revoked or nonexistent certificate of registration practicing or offering to practice when not qualified; any person falsely claiming that person is registered under this chapter; or any person violating any of the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a class B misdemeanor. It is the duty of all duly constituted officers of the state, and of all political subdivisions of the state, to enforce the provisions of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 31; 1975, ch. 106, § 490; 2009, ch. 368, § 30.

Cross-References.

Classification of offenses; penalties, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

43-19.1-32.
Duty of attorney general — Legal counsel.

The attorney general of the state or the attorney general’s assistant shall act as legal adviser to the board and render such legal assistance as may be necessary in carrying out the provisions of this chapter. The board may employ other counsel and necessary assistance to aid in the enforcement or administration of this chapter, and the compensation and expenses therefor must be paid from funds of the board.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 352, § 32.

43-19.1-33.
Continuing professional education — Rules.

The board shall adopt rules to establish continuing education requirements for professional engineers and land surveyors. Compliance with these rules must be documented at the times, and in the manner, as is required by the board. A professional engineer or land surveyor who is exempt under subsection 4 of section 43-19.1-29 but who has voluntarily registered under this chapter is exempt from the continuing professional education requirements under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 363, § 5; 2009, ch. 368, § 31.